Connecticut, session 2026, HB05193.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
three million eight hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of which
shall be used by the Department of Economic and Community
Development for the purpose of providing a grant-in-aid to the town of
Montville for capital improvements to Camp Oakdale.